Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1053
Tattoo, defined.

Tattoo means the indelible decorative mark, figure, or design introduced by insertion of nontoxic dyes or pigments into or under the subcutaneous portion of the skin upon the body of a live human being.

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 15;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-370.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 315.